Maryland, session 2026, HB0845.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
18–3603.
(b) An applicant is eligible for a Maryland Community College Promise
Scholarship award if the applicant:
(2) (I) ENROLLS AT:
1. THE COMMUNITY COLLEGE LOCATED IN THE COUNTY
WHERE THE APPLICANT LIVES;
– 1 –

Ch. 712 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
2. THE REGIONAL COMMUNITY COLLEGE LOCATED IN
THE REGION WHERE THE APPLICANT LIVES; OR
3. A COMMUNITY COLLEGE IN THE STATE THAT HAS AN
ON–CAMPUS RESIDENTIAL FACILITY FOR STUDENTS; AND
(II) 1. Enrolls as a candidate for a vocational certificate, a
certificate, or an associate’s degree or participates in a registered apprenticeship after
graduating from a high school or successfully completing a GED in the State[:
(i) Except as provided in item (ii) of this item, at the community
college located in the county or, in the case of a regional community college, in the region,
where the applicant lives; or
(ii) At a community college in the State that has an on–campus
residential facility for students]; OR
2. A. ENROLLS AS A CANDIDATE FOR A VOCATIONAL
CERTIFICATE, A CERTIFICATE, OR AN ASSOCIATE’S DEGREE OR PARTICIPATES IN A
REGISTERED APPRENTICESHIP AFTER GRADUATING FROM DELMAR HIGH SCHOOL
IN DELMAR, DELAWARE; AND
B. IS A RESIDENT OF DELMAR, MARYLAND;
Subtitle 40. Fallen AND SURVIVING Transportation Workers Scholarship Program.
18–4001.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(B) “ELIGIBLE RECIPIENT” MEANS AN INDIVIDUAL WHO IS:
(1) ACCEPTED FOR ADMISSION OR ENROLLED IN A REGULAR
UNDERGRADUATE, GRADUATE, OR PROFESSIONAL PROGRAM AT AN INSTITUTION OF
POSTSECONDARY EDUCATION;
(2) AT LEAST 16 YEARS OLD; AND
(3) (I) A SURVIVING TRANSPORTATION WORKER;
(II) 1. A CHILD, STEPCHILD, SPOUSE, OR UNMARRIED
PARTNER OF A SURVIVING TRANSPORTATION WORKER; OR
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 712
2. IF A SURVIVING TRANSPORTATION WORKER DOES
NOT HAVE A CHILD, STEPCHILD, SPOUSE, OR UNMARRIED PARTNER, A SIBLING OF
THE SURVIVING TRANSPORTATION WORKER;
(III) 1. A SURVIVING CHILD, STEPCHILD, SPOUSE, OR
UNMARRIED PARTNER OF A FALLEN TRANSPORTATION WORKER; OR
2. IF A FALLEN TRANSPORTATION WORKER DOES NOT
HAVE A SURVIVING CHILD, STEPCHILD, SPOUSE, OR UNMARRIED PARTNER, A
SIBLING OF THE FALLEN TRANSPORTATION WORKER; OR
(IV) A CHILD OR STEPCHILD OF AN UNMARRIED PARTNER.
[(b)] (C) “Fallen transportation worker” means an individual:
(1) Whose occupation is in the construction, rehabilitation, or operation of
a transportation facility or transportation facilities project in the State; and
(2) Who died, on or after January 1, 2022, as a result of an accident
occurring while the individual was performing any job duty necessary for the construction,
maintenance, rehabilitation, or operation of a transportation facility or transportation
facilities project in the State.
[(c)] (D) “Fund” means the Fallen AND SURVIVING Transportation Workers
Scholarship Fund.
[(d)] (E) “Program” means the Fallen AND SURVIVING Transportation Workers
Scholarship Program.
(F) “SURVIVING TRANSPORTATION WORKER” MEANS AN INDIVIDUAL:
(1) WHOSE OCCUPATION IS IN THE CONSTRUCTION,
REHABILITATION, OR OPERATION OF A TRANSPORTATION FACILITY OR
TRANSPORTATION FACILITIES PROJECT IN THE STATE; AND
(2) WHO SURVIVED, ON OR AFTER JANUARY 1, 2022, AN ACCIDENT:
(I) RESULTING IN AT LEAST $100,000,000 IN TOTAL DAMAGES
TO A TRANSPORTATION FACILITY OR TRANSPORTATION FACILITIES PROJECT IN THE
STATE; AND
(II) OCCURRING WHILE THE INDIVIDUAL WAS PERFORMING
ANY JOB DUTY NECESSARY FOR THE CONSTRUCTION, MAINTENANCE,
– 3 –

Ch. 712 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
REHABILITATION, OR OPERATION OF A TRANSPORTATION FACILITY OR
TRANSPORTATION FACILITIES PROJECT IN THE STATE.
(G) “TRANSPORTATION FACILITIES PROJECT” HAS THE MEANING STATED
IN § 4–101 OF THE TRANSPORTATION ARTICLE.
[(e)] (H) “Transportation facility” has the meaning stated in § 3–101 of the
Transportation Article.
[(f) “Transportation facilities project” has the meaning stated in § 4–101 of the
Transportation Article.]
(I) “UNMARRIED PARTNER” MEANS AN INDIVIDUAL WHO:
(1) AT THE TIME OF A FALLEN TRANSPORTATION WORKER’S DEATH:
(I) WAS IN A COMMITTED RELATIONSHIP WITH THE FALLEN
TRANSPORTATION WORKER; AND
(II) SHARED A PRIMARY RESIDENCE WITH THE FALLEN
TRANSPORTATION WORKER; OR AND
(III) WAS RECEIVING AND RELIED ON, IN WHOLE OR IN PART, THE
REASONABLE NECESSITIES OF LIFE FROM THE FALLEN TRANSPORTATION WORKER;
OR
(2) AT THE TIME OF A SURVIVING TRANSPORTATION WORKER’S
ACCIDENT:
(I) WAS IN A COMMITTED RELATIONSHIP WITH THE SURVIVING
TRANSPORTATION WORKER; AND
(II) SHARED A PRIMARY RESIDENCE WITH THE SURVIVING
TRANSPORTATION WORKER; AND
(III) WAS RECEIVING AND RELIED ON, IN WHOLE OR IN PART, THE
REASONABLE NECESSITIES OF LIFE FROM THE SURVIVING TRANSPORTATION
WORKER.
18–4002.
(a) There is a Fallen AND SURVIVING Transportation Workers Scholarship
Program.
– 4 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 712
(b) The purpose of the Program is to provide tuition assistance to a student who
was [a dependent or is the surviving spouse of a fallen transportation worker] IMPACTED
BY AN ACCIDENT INVOLVING A FALLEN TRANSPORTATION WORKER OR A SURVIVING
TRANSPORTATION WORKER.
18–4003.
(a) An individual may apply to an eligible institution of postsecondary education
for a scholarship under this subtitle if the individual is[:
(1) Accepted for admission or enrolled in a regular undergraduate,
graduate, or professional program at an institution of postsecondary education;
(2) At least 16 years old; and
(3) The child, stepchild, or surviving spouse of a fallen transportation
worker] AN ELIGIBLE RECIPIENT OF A SCHOLARSHIP UNDER THIS SUBTITLE.
(b) A scholarship awarded under this subtitle:
(1) May be used for the [tuition and mandatory fees] TOTAL COST OF
ATTENDANCE at any institution of postsecondary education; and
(2) May not:
(i) Exceed the equivalent annual tuition and mandatory fees of an
undergraduate student at the 4–year institution of higher education within the University
System of Maryland, other than the University of Maryland Global Campus and the
University of Maryland, Baltimore Campus, with the highest annual expenses for a
full–time undergraduate; and
(ii) Be less than the lesser of:
1. $3,000; or
2. The equivalent tuition and mandatory fees of the
institution attended by the recipient of the scholarship.
(c) (1) Each institution of postsecondary education shall determine eligibility
of individuals who apply to the institution for the Program.
(2) Subject to the availability of funds, funds for the Program shall be
allocated by the Commission to each institution of postsecondary education based on the
number of eligible recipients attending each institution.
– 5 –

Ch. 712 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(3) In February and October each year, beginning in 2024, each institution
of postsecondary education shall report to the Commission the number of eligible recipients
attending the institution.
(4) The Commission shall allocate funds for awards to institutions of
postsecondary education on verification of eligible recipients attending the institutions.
(5) If funds cannot be allocated in the fiscal year in which awards are made,
priority shall be given to allocating funds for those awards in the immediately following
fiscal year.
(d) Each recipient of a scholarship under this subtitle may hold the award for 5
years of full–time study or 8 years of part–time study.
(e) To the extent practicable, the Department of Transportation, a local
department of transportation, or a contractor that employed fallen transportation workers
OR SURVIVING TRANSPORTATION WORKERS shall provide to the Commission the names
and contact information for the families of the fallen transportation workers OR
SURVIVING TRANSPORTATION WORKERS AFTER ANY ACCIDENT RESULTING IN
ELIGIBILITY FOR A SCHOLARSHIP UNDER THIS SUBTITLE.
18–4004.
(a) There is a Fallen AND SURVIVING Transportation Workers Scholarship
Fund.
(b) The Commission shall administer the Fund.
(c) (1) The Fund is a special, nonlapsing fund that is not subject to § 7–302 of
the State Finance and Procurement Article.
(2) The State Treasurer shall hold the Fund separately, and the
Comptroller shall account for the Fund.
(d) The Fund consists of:
(1) Money appropriated in the State budget to the Fund;
(2) Interest earnings; and
(3) Any other money from any other source accepted by the Commission for
the benefit of the Fund.
(e) The Fund may be used only to award scholarships under the Program.
– 6 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 712
(f) (1) The State Treasurer shall invest the money of the Fund in the same
manner as other State money may be invested.
(2) Any interest earnings of the Fund shall be credited to the Fund.
(g) Expenditures from the Fund may be made only in accordance with the State
budget.
(h) The Commission:
(1) May accept any gift or grant from any person for the Fund; and
(2) Shall deposit any gift or grant that it receives for the Program with the
State Treasurer.
(i) Funding for the Program shall be as provided in the State budget.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.
Approved by the Governor, May 26, 2026.
– 7 –